California, session 20252026, SB462.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The State of California loses 40,000 acres of agricultural land every year to development.(b) The benefits of conserving farmland include preserving ecosystems, preserving wildlife habitat, maintaining a significant sector of California’s economy, protecting a major source of food production for the world, sequestering carbon, and reducing the emissions of greenhouse gases. For areas of the same size, farmland emits 70 times fewer greenhouse gases than urban areas.(c) The State of California state aspires to conserve 30 percent of California’s its lands and coastal waters by 2030. This goal, known as 30x30, is an international movement to combat climate change and protect biodiversity.(d) “Pathways to 30x30 California,” a plan developed by the Natural Resources Agency to promote nature-based conservation solutions, named voluntary conservation easements as 1 of 10 pathways.(e) Conservation easements promote the preservation of critical ecosystems, such as wetlands, agricultural lands, grasslands, and forests, by providing financial incentives to landowners. Easements bring California closer to its 30x30 goals.(f) Historically available funding for conservation easements has not met the high demand.(g) Local governments throughout California have been taking action to permanently preserve agricultural lands through local land use planning, partnering with land trusts, acquiring agricultural lands, and holding both temporary and permanent conservation easements. Their connections to landowners in their communities are critical to building trust.(h) This work is exemplified by counties, like the County of Santa Clara, that incorporate the preservation of agricultural land into their local planning processes.(i) Efforts by local governments to pursue conservation easements require reliable revenue sources. The voters of the County of Sonoma established the Sonoma County Agricultural Preservation and Open Space District. They passed and renewed a local tax to fund the purchase of agricultural and open-space easements.(j) It is imperative that the state take action to support local governments in their efforts to preserve agricultural land for the future of California’s environment, economy, food security, and natural landscapes.SEC. 2. Section 10230 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:10230. (a) The California Farmland Conservancy Program Fund is hereby created.(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), the moneys in the fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, be used for the purposes of the program.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), moneys may be deposited into the fund from federal grants, and gifts and donations, including interest earned, that are designated and required by the donor to be used exclusively for the purposes of the program, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, those moneys are hereby continuously appropriated to the department for expenditure for the purposes of the program.(3) (A) The Controller shall transfer the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) on July 1 of each fiscal year, commencing with the 2025–26 fiscal year, from the General Fund to the California Farmland Conservancy Program Funding Account, which is hereby created within the California Farmland Conservancy Program Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code and paragraph (1), moneys in the account are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year to the department for expenditure as described in this paragraph and consistent with this division.(B) This funding shall only be awarded for agricultural conservation easements on agricultural land as defined in Section 10213, except for grazing land.(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “agricultural conservation easement” means any easement as defined in Section 10211.